Idaho, session 2025, H0342.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Investing in Mothers and Family Act."
SECTION 2. That Chapter 8, Title 57, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 57-829, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
57-829. CHOOSE LIFE IDAHO FUND. (1) There is hereby created in the
state treasury the choose life Idaho fund. Moneys in the fund shall be appro-
priated to choose life Idaho, inc. for the purpose of:
(a) Assisting other organizations that are tax-exempt pursuant to sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that provide life-af-
firming counseling, care, and assistance for women and families to en-
courage alternatives to abortion; and
(b) Education of the public for support of adoption as a positive choice
for women and families who are at risk of choosing abortion.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated for use in Idaho only.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-3029C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3029C. INCOME TAX CREDIT FOR CERTAIN CHARITABLE CONTRIBUTIONS --
LIMITATION. At the election of the taxpayer, there shall be allowed, subject
to the applicable limitations provided herein, as a credit against the in-
come tax imposed by chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, an amount equal to fifty
percent (50%) of the aggregate amount of charitable contributions made by
such taxpayer during the year to the anchor house or its foundation, to the
children's home society of Idaho, inc., to the Idaho youth ranch or its foun-
dation, to kinderhaven or its foundation, to the women's and children's al-
liance or its foundation, to children's village, inc. or its foundation, to
Idaho drug free youth, inc. or its foundation, to gem youth services or its
foundation, to the hope house, inc. or its foundation, to the north Idaho
children's home or its foundation, to the shepherd's home, inc. or its foun-
dation, to a project safe place located within the state of Idaho, to the
learning lab, inc. or its foundation, to a center for independent living lo-


cated within the state of Idaho, to project P.A.T.C.H., planned assistance
for troubled children, to choose life Idaho, inc., to a nonprofit pregnancy
resource center or maternity home located within the state of Idaho that pro-
vides life-affirming counseling, care, and assistance for women and fami-
lies to encourage alternatives to abortion and that have tax-exempt status
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, to a nonprofit
substance abuse center licensed by the department of health and welfare, or
to a nonprofit rehabilitation facility located within the state of Idaho or
its foundation.
(1) In the case of a taxpayer other than a corporation, the amount al-
lowable as a credit under this section for any taxable year shall not exceed
twenty percent (20%) thirty-five percent (35%) of such taxpayer's total in-
come tax liability imposed by section 63-3024, Idaho Code, for the year, or
one hundred dollars ($100), whichever is less.
(2) In the case of a corporation, the amount allowable as a credit under
this section for any taxable year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) twenty-
five percent (25%) of such corporation's total income or franchise tax lia-
bility imposed by sections 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for the year, or
five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is less.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "center for independent living"
shall mean a private, nonprofit, nonresidential organization in which at
least fifty-one percent (51%) of the principal governing board, management
and staff are individuals with disabilities and that:
(a) Is designed and operated within a local community by individuals
with disabilities;
(b) Provides an array of independent living services and programs; and
(c) Is cross-disability.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "nonprofit rehabilitation facil-
ity" means only a facility that is accredited by the commission on accredi-
tation of rehabilitation facilities or another accreditation organization
recognized by the state of Idaho.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-3067A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3067A. INCOME TAX REFUND OR PAYMENT DESIGNATION BY INDIVIDUALS TO
TRUST ACCOUNTS. (1) Every individual who:
(a) Has a refund due and payable for overpayment of taxes under this
chapter may designate all or any portion thereof to be deposited in a
trust account specified in subsection (3) of this section; or
(b) Has an income tax liability may, in addition to his tax obligation,
include a donation to be deposited in a trust account specified in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(2) A designation under subsection (1) of this section may be made in
any taxable year in such manner and form as prescribed by the state tax com-
mission. The manner and form so prescribed shall be a conspicuous portion of
the principal form provided for the purpose of individual taxation.
(3) The trust accounts authorized to receive moneys designated under
subsection (1) of this section are:
(a) The fish and game set-aside account created in section 36-111,
Idaho Code;


(b) The children's trust fund created in section 39-6007, Idaho Code;
(c) The special olympics Idaho fund created in section 57-823, Idaho
Code;
(d) The Idaho guard and reserve family support fund created in section
57-820, Idaho Code;
(e) The Idaho food bank fund created in section 57-824, Idaho Code;
(f) The veterans support fund created in section 65-209, Idaho Code;
and
(g) The American red cross of greater Idaho fund created in section
57-821, Idaho Code.; and
(h) The choose life Idaho fund created in section 57-829, Idaho Code.
(4) Prior to the distribution of funds into any of the trust accounts
specified in subsection (3) of this section from the refund account, the
state tax commission shall retain funds for the commission's costs for
collecting and administering the moneys in the accounts as follows: three
thousand dollars ($3,000) from each account for start-up costs during the
first year of collections, and three thousand dollars ($3,000) or twenty
percent (20%) of the moneys remitted to each account during the fiscal year,
whichever is less, from each account during each fiscal year thereafter,
which amounts are hereby appropriated to the state tax commission.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.